Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1241.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Paid Parental Leave Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Paid Parental Leave Account established under section 504(a)."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Eligible employee." An individual who requests paid 20260SB1241PN1533 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parental leave under this act from an employer and who has:(1) been employed for at least 12 months by the employer; and(2) performed at least 1,250 hours of service with the employer during the previous 12 months."Employer." As described in section 103 of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act."Family and Medical Leave Act." The Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-3, 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.)."Program." The Small Business Grant Program established under section 701."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.CHAPTER 3PAID PARENTAL LEAVESection 301. Employer obligation generally.An employer shall provide, in accordance with this act, not fewer than 12 weeks of paid parental leave to an eligible employee for the purpose of caring for a child of the eligible employee during the first year after:(1) the birth of the child to the eligible employee;(2) the adoption of the child by the eligible employee; or(3) the placement of the child in foster care with the eligible employee.Section 302. Protections and rights.An eligible employee who takes paid parental leave as provided under section 301 is entitled to the same protections and rights to which an eligible employee is entitled under the 20260SB1241PN1533 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Family and Medical Leave Act, including protection from discrimination and interference, the right to reinstatement and the right to continuation of health care benefits.Section 303. Amount of paid parental leave and benefits.(a) Interplay with Federal law.--The amount of leave taken by an eligible employee under this act during a 12-month period shall be counted against the amount of leave to which the eligible employee is entitled under the Family and Medical Leave Act.(b) Rate of pay.--An eligible employee entitled to paid leave under this act shall be paid, during the period of leave, the full rate of pay that the eligible employee received before the period of leave commences or, if the rate of pay is based on an hourly rate, the weekly average applicable during the four weeks before the period of leave commences.Section 304. Prohibitions.An employer may not:(1) Interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of, or attempt to interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of, any right provided under this chapter.(2) Discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, reduce the wages of or in any manner discriminate against an employee for any of the following:(i) Using paid parental leave or attempting to exercise the right to use paid parental leave.(ii) Filing a complaint under this act or alleging a violation of this act.(iii) Cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this act.(iv) Opposing a policy or practice that is 20260SB1241PN1533 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibited under this act.Section 305. Notice.(a) Notice generally.--Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, each employer shall notify each employee of the information described in sections 301, 302, 303 and 304.(b) Contents.--The notice under this section shall be prepared or approved in accordance with regulations prescribed under this act and shall state excerpts from, or summaries of, the pertinent provisions of this act, including information that describes:(1) The availability of paid parental leave available to employees under this act.(2) The filing of an action under this act.(3) The protections that an employee has in exercising rights under this act.(4) How an employee can contact the department if any of the rights under this act are violated.(c) Location.--Each employer shall post and keep posted the notice under this section:(1) in conspicuous places on the premises of the employer, where notices to employees, including applicants, are customarily posted; or(2) in an employee handbook.CHAPTER 5ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENTSection 501. Authorization.(a) Authorization generally.--The department shall administer and enforce Chapter 3.(b) Actions.--In administering and enforcing Chapter 3, an authorized representative of the department may take any of the 20260SB1241PN1533 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following actions:(1) Enter and inspect a worksite or place of business at any reasonable time to examine and inspect records that relate to compliance with Chapter 3.(2) Subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and copy or compel the production of records, contracts and other documents that are necessary and appropriate to administer and enforce this chapter.(3) Petition Commonwealth Court to enforce any subpoena or order issued by the department under this chapter.Section 502. Complaints.(a) Right to file complaint.--An employee may file with the department a complaint against an employer alleging a violation of Chapter 3.(b) Form.--(1) The department shall develop a form to be used to file a complaint under this act.(2) The form developed under paragraph (1) shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(c) Procedures.--The department shall:(1) Prescribe the manner in which a complaint must be submitted.(2) Establish a system for the investigation and resolution of a complaint submitted under this section.Section 503. Administrative penalties.(a) Amount.--The department may impose an administrative penalty of up to $5,000 per violation of Chapter 3.(b) Factors.--When determining the amount of an administrative penalty imposed under this section, the 20260SB1241PN1533 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall consider the following factors:(1) The history of previous violations of Chapter 3 by the employer.(2) The seriousness of the violation.(3) The good faith efforts made by the employer.(4) The size of the employer's business.Section 504. Paid Parental Leave Account.(a) Establishment.--The Paid Parental Leave Account is established within the General Fund into which the department shall deposit administrative penalties imposed under section 503.(b) Operations.--Money deposited into the account shall be appropriated on a continuing basis to the department, upon the request of the secretary, for the following purposes:(1) Subject to paragraph (2) and as directed by the secretary, to compensate each employee or other individual adversely affected by the violation that resulted in the administrative penalty.(2) For payments described in paragraph (1) that cannot be made within three years of the date in which the administrative penalty is ordered, to pay for the costs associated with the administration and enforcement of this act.Section 505. Civil actions by private parties.(a) Right of action.--An employee or other individual who is adversely affected by an alleged violation of this act, including a representative for and on behalf of the employee or other individual and any other employee or individual similarly situated, may bring a civil action against an employer in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover damages or equitable 20260SB1241PN1533 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relief in accordance with this section.(b) Liability.--An employer who violates section 304 shall be liable to an employee or other individual adversely affected for the following:(1) Monetary damages equal to:(i) The amount of:(A) wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation denied or lost by reason of the violation; or(B) if wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation have not been denied or lost, any actual monetary losses sustained as a direct result of the violation up to a sum equal to 12 weeks of wages or salary for the employee or individual.(ii) The interest on the amount described in subparagraph (i) calculated at the prevailing rate.(iii) An additional amount as liquidated damages.(2) Equitable relief as may be appropriate, including employment, reinstatement and promotion.(c) Fees and costs.--If a plaintiff prevails in an action under this section, the court may award to the plaintiff reasonable attorney fees, reasonable expert witness fees and other costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.Section 506. Civil actions by department.(a) Authorization.--The department may bring a civil action against an employer in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover damages or equitable relief, including fees and costs, in accordance with section 505, on behalf of an employee or other individual who is adversely affected by an alleged violation of this act.20260SB1241PN1533 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Effect of action.--An action brought under section 505 shall terminate upon the filing of an action under this section.(c) Recovery of money.--Any monetary damages, fees or costs recovered by the department in an action under this section shall be deposited into the account for the purposes described in section 504(b).Section 507. Limitation of civil actions.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a civil action for an alleged violation of this act may be brought no later than two years after the date of the last event constituting the alleged violation.(b) Exception.--A civil action for an alleged willful violation of this act may be brought no later than three years after the date of the last event constituting the alleged willful violation.CHAPTER 7SMALL BUSINESS GRANT PROGRAMSection 701. Establishment of program.The Small Business Grant Program is established in the department to provide grants to employers to assist with their compliance with this act.Section 702. Application form.(a) Development.--The department shall develop an application form for employers to apply for grants under the program.(b) Contents.--The application form shall include:(1) The name and contact information of the applicant.(2) The amount and nature of the assistance sought.(c) Posting.--The application form shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.20260SB1241PN1533 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 703. Guidelines.(a) Contents.--The department shall develop guidelines regarding the program, which shall include:(1) The manner in which employers must submit applications to apply for grants under the program.(2) Deadlines for applying for grants.(3) The review and approval process for grant applications.(b) Considerations.--The department shall consider implementing a business income limit cap for employers applying for grants under the program.(c) Publication.--Upon the development of the guidelines under this section, the department shall transmit notice of the development of the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 704. Appropriation.The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated to the department for the purpose of implementing and administering the program, including the awarding of grants under the program.CHAPTER 9MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Construction.(a) Effect of chapter.--This act provides minimum requirements pertaining to paid parental leave. Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Preempt, limit or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy or standard that:(i) Provides greater benefit to employees.20260SB1241PN1533 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Extends other protections to employees.(2) Discourage or prohibit an employer from adopting or retaining a paid parental leave policy that is more generous than what is required under this chapter.(3) Affect an obligation by an employer to comply with a collective bargaining agreement or employer benefit plan that provides greater paid parental leave rights for employees.(b) Subsequent collective bargaining agreement or employer policy.--An individual's right to leave and the payment of benefits under this act may not be diminished by:(1) A collective bargaining agreement that is entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) An employer policy that is adopted or retained on or after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 902. Waiver prohibited.An agreement by an individual to waive the individual's rights under this act is void as against public policy.Section 903. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations to administer and enforce this act.Section 904. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20260SB1241PN1533 - 11 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223